Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4249.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for various state departments 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch to supplement appropriations for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 6,000,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 6,000,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Contracted ambulance providers $ 6,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 6,000,000 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations general sections Sec. 201. Pursuant to section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources under part 1 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 is $6,000,000.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 and the departments, commissions, boards, offices, and programs for which appropriations are made under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY Sec. 301. Funds appropriated in part 1 for contracted ambulance providers must be used by the department to reimburse ambulance providers that are in full compliance with section 20921 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20921, and that can verify they are owed payments by a provider of health care services the department of corrections contracted with for services between 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 the years of 2023 and 2024. Sec. 302. (1) Within 30 days of the effective date of this act, the department shall collaborate with the department of corrections to develop a grant application that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of the ambulance provider applying for a grant. (b) The location of the principal office of the ambulance provider. (c) The grant amount sought by the ambulance provider. (d) Documentation supporting the grant amount sought by the ambulance provider. (2) The department shall publish the grant application on the department's publicly accessible website immediately upon development. (3) The department shall allow 30 days from publication of the application for potential grant recipients to apply for grant funding. (4) The department shall distribute grant funding not later than 30 days after the grant application window is closed. Sec. 303. If any recipient of grant funding provided under this section receives reimbursement of services provided through a litigation settlement, funding received through the litigation settlement must be returned to this state. Sec. 304. (1) Funds distributed to ambulance providers must not exceed the amount agreed to by the former provider of health care services. (2) Any funds remaining after the debt to ambulance providers has been satisfied must lapse to the state general fund.